Utah statutes.
72-10-114.   Mechanic's certificate of competency.

(1)  Mechanics will be rated as airframe or powerplant mechanics.

(2)  A person may hold a plurality of certificate of competency, including both classes of mechanic's certificate of competency or a pilot's and mechanic's certificate of competency.

(3)  The certificate shall be a currently effective certificate of competency issued by the government of the United States.

(4)  This restriction does not apply to mechanics employed by the United States government.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

